Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 4. Urban Highway System.

§ 33.2-347.
Minimum street and highway standards for certain towns.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33.2-340

, any town in which 70 percent or more of developable land within its boundaries has a natural grade of 20 percent or more may by ordinance provide for streets or highways established on or after July 1, 1980, with an unrestricted right-of-way width of not less than 40 feet and a hard-surface width of not less than 18 feet, provided that no such requirement of any such town shall be less stringent than that of the county in which the town is located. Streets and highways so established and constructed shall be eligible for payment in accordance with §

33.2-340

.

History.

1980, c. 374, § 33.1-43.2; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-348.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 684, cl. 6, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s note.

Former §

33.2-348

, pertaining to Matching highway funds; funding of urban system construction projects, derived from Code 1950, § 33-35.5; 1958, c. 584; 1964, c. 256; 1970, cc. 322, 403, § 33.1-44; 1977, c. 578; 1979, c. 84; 1980, c. 128; 1981, c.
370; 1987, c. 545; 1989, c. 303; 1991, c. 353; 2000, c. 762;
2002, c. 673; 2007, c. 813; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 30.

Acts 2015, c. 684, cl. 7 provides:
“That the repeal of §§

33.2-348

,

33.2-361

, 33.2-362, and

33.2-364

of the Code of Virginia shall not affect the expenditure of funds that are allocated pursuant to those sections by July 1, 2016.”

§ 33.2-349.
Character of signs, markings, and signals.

On any urban highway upon which the Board has expended funds, the location, form, and character of informational, regulatory, and warning signs, curb and pavement, or other markings and traffic signals installed or placed by any public authority shall be subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Highways.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-35.7; 1964, c. 256; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-46; 1977, c. 578; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 deleted “in the manner provided in §§

33.2-348

and 33.2-362” following “has expended funds.”

§ 33.2-350.
Landscape studies for urban highway construction projects.

Prior to final design of any urban highway funded in part by any municipality, such municipality may hire a competent authority to conduct a landscape study that shall assess the effect such proposed highway construction may have on existing trees, shrubbery, and other flora and shall make recommendations as to modifications to such project that would minimize damage to existing flora. The Department shall consider such recommendations and modify such highway construction plans to protect trees, shrubbery, and other flora if determined by the Department to be reasonable and practicable. The cost of such landscape study shall be payable by the municipality that initiates such study.

History.

1975, c. 555, § 33.1-47.1; 2014, c. 805.